Maryland, session 2026, HB1570.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
10–1703.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DECISION–SUPPORT ALGORITHM” MEANS A COMPUTER
PROGRAM USED BY A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT TO IMPROVE DECISION MAKING
THAT IS EVALUATED BY A TECHNICAL EXPERT BEFORE BEING USED.
(3) “STANDARDS” MEANS OPERATIONAL, TECHNICAL, OR
PROCEDURAL BENCHMARKS USED TO GUIDE IMPLEMENTATION PROCESSES.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1570*

HOUSE BILL 1570
(B) IN DEVELOPING STANDARDS, A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT SHALL:
(1) RELY ONLY ON FEASIBLE, TRANSPARENT, AND REPRODUCIBLE
DATA;
(2) INCORPORATE FIRST–HAND KNOWLEDGE, INCLUDING BEST
PRACTICES AND REAL–WORLD EXPERIENCES;
(3) SEEK CONSENSUS AMONG STAKEHOLDERS;
(4) RESOLVE DISPUTES THROUGH INDEPENDENT THIRD–PARTY
TECHNICAL REVIEW USING RECOGNIZED RESEARCH AND EXPERTISE AND
REFERENCE TO RECOGNIZED INTERNATIONAL STANDARDS;
(5) AVOID RELYING ON TECHNICAL EXPERTS FOUND TO BE BIASED,
AS DETERMINED BY INDEPENDENT REVIEWS;
(6) TAKE INTO ACCOUNT:
(I) TRANSFORMATIVE LARGE–SCALE ECONOMIC EFFICIENCY;
(II) SCIENTIFIC STANDARDS;
(III) CULTURAL PRACTICES;
(IV) COMPARATIVE ADVANTAGES; AND
(V) STRUCTURED INPUT FROM MULTIDISCIPLINARY EXPERTS;
AND
(7) UTILIZE A DECISION–SUPPORT ALGORITHM.
(C) ANY INITIAL STANDARDS ADOPTED BY A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT
SHALL:
(1) BE BASED ON EXISTING CODES AND REGULATIONS, UNLESS
OTHERWISE SPECIFIED;
(2) CONFIRM EXISTING PRACTICES AND STANDARDS; AND
(3) CLEARLY DEFINE GOALS, RISKS, AND METHODS.

HOUSE BILL 1570 3
(D) ANY STANDARDS ADOPTED BY A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT SHALL
BE REVIEWED PERIODICALLY USING:
(1) CURRENT TECHNOLOGICAL BEST PRACTICES; AND
(2) INDEPENDENT PEER INPUT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.